Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1482
Explanation of utility charges and services; required; when.

The landlord or any person authorized to enter into a rental agreement on the landlord's behalf shall provide a written explanation of utility rates, charges, and services to the prospective tenant before the rental agreement is signed unless the utility charges are to be paid by the tenant directly to the utility company.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 33.